Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 4. DEVELOPMENT AND IMPROVEMENT

SUBTITLE C. DEVELOPMENT, IMPROVEMENT, AND MANAGEMENT

CHAPTER 3803. GREATER GREENSPOINT MANAGEMENT DISTRICT OF HARRIS COUNTY

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 3803.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of directors of the district.

(2) "District" means the Greater Greenspoint Management District of Harris County.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 3803.002. GREATER GREENSPOINT MANAGEMENT DISTRICT OF HARRIS COUNTY. A special district known as the "Greater Greenspoint Management District of Harris County" is a governmental agency and political subdivision of this state.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 3803.003. PURPOSE; DECLARATION OF INTENT. (a) The creation of the district is essential to accomplish the purposes of Sections 52 and 52-a, Article III, and Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, and to other public purposes stated in this chapter. By creating the district and in authorizing Harris County, the City of Houston, and other political subdivisions to contract with the district, the legislature has established a program to accomplish the public purposes set out in Section 52-a, Article III, Texas Constitution.

(b) The creation of the district is necessary to promote, develop, encourage, and maintain employment, commerce, economic development, the public welfare, transportation, housing, tourism, convention and convocation activities, recreation, the arts, entertainment, and safety in the greater Greenspoint area of Harris County.

(c) This chapter and the creation of the district may not be interpreted to relieve Harris County or the City of Houston from providing the level of services provided as of August 26, 1991, to the area in the district or to release the county or the city from the obligations of each entity to provide services to that area. The district is created to supplement and not to supplant the county or city services in the area in the district.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 3803.004. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT AND PUBLIC PURPOSE. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the improvements and services to be provided by the district under powers conferred by Sections 52 and 52-a, Article III, and Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, and other powers granted under this chapter.

(c) The creation of the district is in the public interest and is essential to:

(1) further the public purposes of developing and diversifying the economy of the state;

(2) eliminate unemployment and underemployment; and

(3) develop or expand transportation and commerce.

(d) The district will:

(1) promote the health, safety, and general welfare of residents, employers, employees, and consumers in the district, and of the public;

(2) provide needed funding for the greater Greenspoint area to preserve, maintain, and enhance the economic health and vitality of the area as a community and business center;

(3) promote the health, safety, welfare, and enjoyment of the public by providing pedestrian ways and by landscaping and developing certain areas in the district, which are necessary for the restoration, preservation, and enhancement of scenic and aesthetic beauty; and

(4) eliminate unemployment and underemployment and develop or expand transportation and commerce by providing or by participating with other entities and educational institutions in establishing, equipping, financing, and operating workforce development, workforce education, and job training opportunities.

(e) Pedestrian ways along or across a street, whether at grade or above or below the surface, and street lighting, street landscaping, and street art objects are parts of and necessary components of a street and are considered to be a street or road improvement.

(f) The district will not act as the agent or instrumentality of any private interest even though the district will benefit many private interests as well as the public.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 133 (H.B. 2200), Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 2015.

Sec. 3803.005. DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is composed of the territory described by Section 23.04(b), Chapter 165, Acts of the 75th Legislature, Regular Session, 1997, enacting former Section 376.084, Local Government Code, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code; or

(2) other law.

(b) The boundaries and field notes of the district contained in Section 23.04(b), Chapter 165, Acts of the 75th Legislature, Regular Session, 1997, enacting former Section 376.084, Local Government Code, form a closure. A mistake in the field notes or in copying the field notes in the legislative process does not in any way affect:

(1) the district's organization, existence, and validity;

(2) the district's right to issue any type of bond, including a refunding bond, for a purpose for which the district is created or to pay the principal of and interest on the bond;

(3) the district's right to impose and collect an assessment or tax; or

(4) the legality or operation of the district or the board.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 3803.006. ELIGIBILITY FOR REINVESTMENT OR ENTERPRISE ZONES. (a) All or any part of the area of the district is eligible, regardless of other statutory criteria, to be included in:

(1) a tax increment reinvestment zone created by the City of Houston under Chapter 311, Tax Code; or

(2) a tax abatement reinvestment zone created by the City of Houston under Chapter 312, Tax Code.

(b) All or any part of the area of the district is eligible to be nominated for inclusion in an enterprise zone by the City of Houston under Chapter 2303, Government Code.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 3803.007. FORECLOSURE OF PREEXISTING TAX LIEN ON PROPERTY OWNED BY DISTRICT PROHIBITED. Regardless of the manner in which or the price for which the district obtains title to real property, a political subdivision or taxing authority may not foreclose a tax lien or otherwise pursue unpaid taxes on the property against the district or any successor in title to the district that is a political subdivision of this state if the lien or taxes accrued before the district's ownership of the property.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 3803.009. LIBERAL CONSTRUCTION OF CHAPTER. This chapter shall be liberally construed in conformity with the legislative findings and purposes stated in this chapter.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 3803.051. BOARD OF DIRECTORS; TERMS. (a) The district is governed by a board of 22 directors who serve staggered terms of four years, with 11 directors' terms expiring June 1 of each odd-numbered year.

(b) The board by resolution may increase or decrease the number of directors on the board, but only if it is in the best interest of the district to do so. The board may not:

(1) increase the number of directors to more than 30; or

(2) decrease the number of directors to fewer than nine.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 133 (H.B. 2200), Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 2015.

Sec. 3803.052. APPOINTMENT OF DIRECTORS. Subchapter D, Chapter 375, Local Government Code, governs the appointment and qualification of directors.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 3803.101. DISTRICT POWERS. The district has:

(1) all powers necessary to accomplish the purposes for which the district was created;

(2) the rights, powers, privileges, and authority of a district created under Chapter 375, Local Government Code;

(3) the powers given to a corporation created under the Development Corporation Act (Subtitle C1, Title 12, Local Government Code), including:

(A) the power to own, operate, acquire, construct, lease, improve, and maintain the projects described by that Act and this chapter and any other authorized project; and

(B) the power to acquire land and other property in accordance with Chapter 505, Local Government Code; and

(4) the power to create, tax, assess, and hold elections in a defined area under Chapter 54, Water Code, to provide improvements or services in the defined area for any project or activity the district is authorized to acquire, construct, improve, or provide.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.32, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 3803.102. NONPROFIT CORPORATION. (a) The board by resolution may authorize the creation of a nonprofit corporation to assist and act for the district in implementing a project, providing residential housing, or providing a service authorized by this chapter.

(b) The nonprofit corporation:

(1) has each power of and is considered for all purposes to be a local government corporation created under Chapter 431, Transportation Code; and

(2) may implement any project and provide any service authorized by this chapter.

(c) The board shall appoint the board of directors of the nonprofit corporation. The board of directors of the nonprofit corporation shall serve in the same manner as, for the same term as, and on the conditions of the board of directors of a local government corporation created under Chapter 431, Transportation Code.

(d) The nonprofit corporation may be dissolved as provided by Chapter 431, Transportation Code, for a corporation created under that chapter.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 3803.103. CONTRACTS; GRANTS. (a) To protect the public interest, the district may contract with any county or municipality in which all or part of the district is located for the county or municipality to provide law enforcement services in the district for a fee.

(b) Harris County, the City of Houston, or another political subdivision of this state, without further authorization, may contract with the district to implement a project of the district or to assist the district in providing an authorized service. A contract under this subsection may:

(1) be for a period on which the parties agree;

(2) include terms on which the parties agree;

(3) be payable from taxes or any other source of revenue that may be available for the project or service; and

(4) provide terms under which taxes or other revenue collected at a district project, at a project in a tax increment reinvestment zone, or from a person using or purchasing a commodity or service at a district project may be paid or rebated to the district.

(c) The district may enter into a contract, lease, or other agreement with or make or accept a grant or loan to or from any person, including:

(1) the United States;

(2) this state or a state agency;

(3) any political subdivision of this state; or

(4) a public or private corporation, including a nonprofit corporation created by the board under this subchapter.

(d) The district may perform all acts necessary for the full exercise of the powers vested in the district on terms and for the period the board determines advisable.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 3803.104. MEMBERSHIP IN CHARITABLE ORGANIZATIONS. (a) The district may:

(1) join and pay dues to an organization that qualifies for an exemption from federal income taxation under Section 501(a), Internal Revenue Code of 1986, by being listed as an exempt organization under Section 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), or 501(c)(6) of that code; and

(2) perform services or provide activities consistent with the furtherance of the purposes of the district.

(b) An expenditure of public money for membership in an organization described by Subsection (a) is considered to further the purposes of the district and to be for a public purpose.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 3803.105. NO EMINENT DOMAIN POWER. The district may not exercise the power of eminent domain.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 684 (S.B. 224), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 3803.106. PLANS FOR WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT SERVICES. (a) The district may develop and implement one or more plans for workforce development services. The services may include:

(1) job training;

(2) workforce education;

(3) financing of special educational opportunities; or

(4) other projects that promote workforce development.

(b) To assist in implementing a plan for workforce development services, the district may:

(1) accept a donation, grant, or loan from any person;

(2) work with a school at any level;

(3) work with any person that provides workforce development money or projects; or

(4) participate with any other entity.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 133 (H.B. 2200), Sec. 3, eff. May 28, 2015.

Sec. 3803.107. ANNEXATION OF LAND. The district may annex land as provided by Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 133 (H.B. 2200), Sec. 3, eff. May 28, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER D. FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 3803.151. PETITION REQUIRED FOR FINANCING SERVICES AND IMPROVEMENTS. (a) The board may not finance a service or an improvement project under this chapter unless a written petition requesting the service or improvement is filed with the board.

(b) The petition must be signed by:

(1) the owners of a majority of the assessed value of real property in the district according to the most recent certified tax appraisal roll for Harris County; or

(2) at least 50 owners of land in the district, if more than 50 persons own land in the district according to the most recent certified tax appraisal roll for Harris County.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 3803.1515. DISBURSEMENTS AND TRANSFERS OF MONEY. The board by resolution shall establish the number of directors' signatures and the procedure required for a disbursement or transfer of the district's money.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 133 (H.B. 2200), Sec. 4, eff. May 28, 2015.

Sec. 3803.152. AUTHORITY TO IMPOSE AD VALOREM TAXES, ASSESSMENTS, AND IMPACT FEES. The district may, except as provided by Section 3803.156, impose an ad valorem tax, assessment, or impact fee as provided by Chapter 375, Local Government Code, to provide an improvement or service for a project or activity the district may acquire, construct, improve, or provide under this chapter.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 3803.153. MAINTENANCE TAX. (a) If authorized at an election held in accordance with Section 3803.158, the district may impose an annual ad valorem tax on taxable property in the district to:

(1) maintain and operate the district and the improvements constructed or acquired by the district; and

(2) provide services to industrial or commercial businesses, residents, or property owners.

(b) The board shall determine the tax rate.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 3803.154. ASSESSMENTS; LIENS FOR ASSESSMENTS. (a) The district may correct, add to, or delete an assessment from its assessment rolls and collect an assessment due under the correction, addition, or deletion if:

(1) the district gives notice and hearing in the manner required by Section 375.115, Local Government Code; or

(2) the change does not increase the amount of assessment of any parcel of land.

(b) An assessment, a reassessment, or an assessment resulting from an addition to or correction of the assessment roll by the district, penalties and interest on an assessment or reassessment, an expense of collection, and reasonable attorney's fees incurred by the district:

(1) are a first and prior lien against the property assessed;

(2) are superior to any other lien or claim other than a lien or claim for county, school district, or municipal ad valorem taxes; and

(3) are the personal liability of and a charge against the owners of the property even if the owners are not named in the assessment proceeding.

(c) The lien is effective from the date of the board's resolution imposing the assessment until the date the assessment is paid. The board may enforce the lien in the same manner that the board may enforce an ad valorem tax lien against real property.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 133 (H.B. 2200), Sec. 5, eff. May 28, 2015.

Sec. 3803.155. TAX AND ASSESSMENT ABATEMENTS. Without further authorization or other procedural requirement, the district may grant, consistent with Chapter 312, Tax Code, an abatement for a tax or assessment owed to the district.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 3803.156. PROPERTY EXEMPT FROM ASSESSMENT AND IMPACT FEES. Because the district is created in an area that is devoted primarily to commercial and business activity, the district may not impose an impact fee or assessment on a detached single-family residential property or a residential duplex, triplex, fourplex, or condominium. A condominium is exempt under this section only if for the year in which the impact fee or assessment is imposed on the condominium, the condominium receives a residence homestead exemption under Section 11.13, Tax Code.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 773 (H.B. 3528), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 3803.157. OBLIGATIONS. (a) The district may issue bonds or other obligations payable in whole or in part from ad valorem taxes, assessments, impact fees, revenue, grants, or other money of the district, or any combination of those sources of money, to pay for any authorized purpose of the district.

(b) In exercising the district's borrowing power, the district may issue a bond or other obligation in the form of a bond, note, certificate of participation or other instrument evidencing a proportionate interest in payments to be made by the district, or other type of obligation.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 3803.158. ELECTIONS REGARDING TAXES OR BONDS. (a) The district must hold an election in the manner provided by Subchapter L, Chapter 375, Local Government Code, to obtain voter approval before the district may:

(1) impose a maintenance tax; or

(2) issue a bond payable from ad valorem taxes or assessments.

(b) The board may submit multiple purposes in a single proposition at an election.

(c) The board may not call an election under this chapter unless a written petition requesting an election is filed with the board. The petition must be signed by 50 owners of property in the district, if more than 50 persons own property in the district according to the most recent certified tax appraisal roll for Harris County.

(d) When issuing a bond payable from a defined area under Chapter 54, Water Code, the district must hold the required election only in the defined area and not in the entire district.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 3803.159. SALES AND USE TAX PROHIBITED. The district may not impose a sales and use tax.

Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1277, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.